Utah statutes.
79-2-201.   Department of Natural Resources created.
(1)  There is created the Department of Natural Resources.
(2)  The department comprises the following:
(a)  Board of Water Resources, created in Section 73-10-1.5;
(b)  Forestry, Fire, and State Lands Advisory Council, created in Section
65A-1-2;
(c)  Board of Oil, Gas, and Mining, created in Section 40-6-4;
(d)  Board of Parks and Recreation, created in Section 79-4-301;
(e)  Wildlife Board, created in Section 23-14-2;
(f)  Board of the Utah Geological Survey, created in Section 79-3-301;
(g)  Water Development Coordinating Council, created in Section 73-10c-3;
(h)  Division of Water Rights, created in Section 73-2-1.1;
(i)  Division of Water Resources, created in Section 73-10-18;
(j)  Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, created in Section 65A-1-4;
(k)  Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining, created in Section 40-6-15;
(l)  Division of Parks and Recreation, created in Section 79-4-201;
(m)  Division of Wildlife Resources, created in Section 23-14-1;
(n)  Utah Geological Survey, created in Section 79-3-201;
(o)  Heritage Trees Advisory Committee, created in Section 65A-8-306;
(p)  Recreational Trails Advisory Council, authorized by Section 79-5-201;
(q)  Boating Advisory Council, authorized by Section 73-18-3.5;
(r)  Wildlife Board Nominating Committee, created in Section 23-14-2.5; and
(s)  Wildlife Regional Advisory Councils, created in Section 23-14-2.6.
